Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-108
Collector, defined.

Collector means the owner of one or more vehicles of historical interest who collects, purchases, acquires, trades, or disposes of such vehicles or parts thereof for his or her own use in order to preserve, restore, and maintain a vehicle or vehicles for hobby purposes.

Laws 2005, LB 276, § 8.